pl: Materiał tabliczki nagrody: Akryl; Aluminium; Mosiądz; Brąz; Miedź; Szkło; Metal w kolorze złota; Metal w kolorze srebra; Stal nierdzewna; Drewno; Stop cynku; Inne
sv: Material för prisplakett: Akryl; Aluminium; Mässing; Brons; Koppar; Glas; Guldfärgad metall; Silverfärgad metall; Rostfritt stål; Trä; Zinklegering; Annat
es: Material de la placa del premio: Acrílico; Aluminio; Latón; Bronce; Cobre; Vidrio; Metal en tono dorado; Metal en tono plateado; Acero inoxidable; Madera; Aleación de zinc; Otro
pt-BR: Material da placa de premiação: Acrílico; Alumínio; Latão; Bronze; Cobre; Vidro; Metal dourado; Metal prateado; Aço inoxidável; Madeira; Liga de zinco; Outro
th: วัสดุโล่รางวัล: อะคริลิก; อะลูมิเนียม; ทองเหลือง; บรอนซ์; ทองแดง; แก้ว; โลหะสีทอง; โลหะสีเงิน; สเตนเลสสตีล; ไม้; ซิงก์อัลลอย; อื่นๆ
hu: Díjtábla anyaga: Akril; Alumínium; Sárgaréz; Bronz; Réz; Üveg; Arany színű fém; Ezüst színű fém; Rozsdamentes acél; Fa; Cinkötvözet; Egyéb
el: Υλικό πλάκας βραβείων: Ακρυλικό; Αλουμίνιο; Ορείχαλκος; Μπρούντζος; Χαλκός; Γυαλί; Μέταλλο σε χρυσή απόχρωση; Μέταλλο σε ασημί απόχρωση; Ανοξείδωτο ατσάλι; Ξύλο; Κράμα ψευδαργύρου; Άλλο
hr-HR: Materijal nagradne plakete: Akril; Aluminij; Mjed; Bronca; Bakar; Staklo; Metal zlatnog tona; Metal srebrnog tona; Nehrđajući čelik; Drvo; Legura cinka; Ostalo
ko: 상패 명판 재질: 아크릴; 알루미늄; 황동; 청동; 구리; 유리; 골드톤 금속; 실버톤 금속; 스테인리스 스틸; 목재; 아연 합금; 기타
en: Award plaque plate material: Acrylic; Aluminum; Brass; Bronze; Copper; Glass; Gold-tone metal; Silver-tone metal; Stainless steel; Wood; Zinc alloy; Other
tr: Ödül plaketi levha malzemesi: Akrilik; Alüminyum; Pirinç; Bronz; Bakır; Cam; Altın tonlu metal; Gümüş tonlu metal; Paslanmaz çelik; Ahşap; Çinko alaşımı; Diğer
da: Materiale til præmieplaketten: Akryl; Aluminium; Messing; Bronze; Kobber; Glas; Guldfarvet metal; Sølvfarvet metal; Rustfrit stål; Træ; Zinklegering; Andet
vi: Chất liệu tấm bảng giải thưởng: Acrylic; Nhôm; Đồng thau; Đồng; Đồng đỏ; Thủy tinh; Kim loại màu vàng; Kim loại màu bạc; Thép không gỉ; Gỗ; Hợp kim kẽm; Khác
ja: 賞品銘板のプレート素材: アクリル; アルミニウム; 真鍮; ブロンズ; 銅; ガラス; ゴールドトーンメタル; シルバートーンメタル; ステンレス鋼; 木製; 亜鉛合金; その他
sk-SK: Materiál tabuľky plakety: Akryl; Hliník; Mosadz; Bronz; Meď; Sklo; Kov zlatej farby; Kov striebornej farby; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Drevo; Zliatina zinku; Iné
ro-RO: Materialul etichetei pentru plăcuța certificatului: Acril; Aluminiu; Alamă; Bronz; Cupru; Sticlă; Metal cu nuanță aurie; Metal cu nuanță argintie; Oțel inoxidabil; Lemn; Aliaj de zinc; Altele
nb: Materiale for prisplakettplate: Akryl; Aluminium; Messing; Bronse; Kobber; Glass; Gullfarget metall; Sølvfarget metall; Rustfritt stål; Tre; Sinklegering; Annet
de: Material für Auszeichnungsplaketten: Acryl; Aluminium; Messing; Bronze; Kupfer; Glas; Goldfarbenes Metall; Silberfarbenes Metall; Edelstahl; Holz; Zinklegierung; Sonstige
lt-LT: Apdovanojimo lentelės medžiaga: Akrilas; Aliuminis; Žalvaris; Bronza; Varis; Stiklas; Aukso spalvos metalas; Sidabro spalvos metalas; Nerūdijantis plienas; Mediena; Cinko lydinys; Kita
pt-PT: Material da placa de prémio: Acrílico; Alumínio; Latão; Bronze; Cobre; Vidro; Metal dourado; Metal prateado; Aço inoxidável; Madeira; Liga de zinco; Outros
zh-CN: 奖牌牌匾材质: 亚克力; 铝质; 黄铜; 青铜; 紫铜; 玻璃; 金色金属; 银色金属; 不锈钢; 木质; 锌合金; 其他
bg-BG: Материал на плакета на наградната плоча: Акрил; Алуминий; Месинг; Бронз; Мед; Стъкло; Метал със златист оттенък; Метал със сребрист оттенък; Неръждаема стомана; Дърво; Цинкова сплав; Друго
cs: Materiál štítku plakety s oceněním: Akryl; Hliník; Mosaz; Bronz; Měď; Sklo; Kov ve zlaté barvě; Kov ve stříbrné barvě; Nerezová ocel; Dřevo; Slitina zinku; Ostatní
fr: Matériau de la plaque de trophée: Acrylique; Aluminium; Laiton; Bronze; Cuivre; Verre; Métal doré; Métal argenté; Acier inoxydable; Bois; Alliage de zinc; Autre
it: Materiale per targhe premio: Acrilico; Alluminio; Ottone; Bronzo; Rame; Vetro; Metallo color oro; Metallo color argento; Acciaio inossidabile; Legno; Lega di zinco; Altro
fi: Palkintolaatan materiaali: Akryyli; Alumiini; Messinki; Pronssi; Kupari; Lasi; Kullansävyinen metalli; Hopeansävyinen metalli; Ruostumaton teräs; Puu; Sinkkiseos; Muu
nl: Awardplaquette plaatmateriaal: Acryl; Aluminium; Messing; Brons; Koper; Glas; Goudkleurig metaal; Zilverkleurig metaal; Roestvrij staal; Hout; Zinklegering; Overige
sl-SI: Material plakete: Akril; Aluminij; Medenina; Bron; Baker; Steklo; Kovina v zlati barvi; Kovina v srebrni barvi; Nerjavno jeklo; Les; Cinkova zlitina; Drugo
zh-TW: 獎牌銘版材質: 壓克力; 鋁; 黃銅; 青銅; 銅; 玻璃; 金色金屬; 銀色金屬; 不鏽鋼; 木材; 鋅合金; 其他
ru: Материал таблички награды: Акрил; Алюминий; Латунь; Бронза; Медь; Стекло; Металл под золото; Металл под серебро; Нержавеющая сталь; Дерево; Цинковый сплав; Другое